Washington statutes.
RCW 24.55.075

Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 3; 2009 c 436 s 9.]